District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as “Child Fatality Review Committee Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 4604(a-1) of the Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Act of
2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28, D.C. Official Code § 4-1371.04(a-1)), is
amended by striking the phrase “human services” and inserting the phrase “child and family
services” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2